foma/english-toy.lexc
!!! english-toy.lexc !!!
!!! apply down: underlying to surface e.g. appy down try+N+Pl !!!
!!! apply up: all possible analyses of word e.g. apply up try !!!

Multichar_Symbols +Adj +N +V +Sg +Pl +Prs +3sg +Pst +PstPtcp +PrsPtcp

LEXICON Root
Noun ;
Verb ;
Adj  ;

LEXICON Adj

happy	Adjder;

LEXICON Adjder

+N:^ness	Nder;
+N:^ness	#;

LEXICON Noun

car	Ninfl;
salmon	Ninfl;
pig	Ninfl;
picnic	Ninfl;
box	Ninfl;
church	Ninfl;
goose	Ninfl;
try	Ninfl;
Alambak	Ninfl;

LEXICON Nder

+Adj:^less	Adjder;
+Adj:^less	#;

LEXICON Ninfl
+N+Sg:0		#;
+N+Pl:^s	#;

LEXICON Verb

try	Vinfl;
swim	Vinfl;
floss	Vinfl;
explode	Vinfl;
move	Vinfl;
give	Vinfl;
have	Vinfl;
go	Vinfl;
go+V+	#;
go+V+Pst:went	#;
walk	Vinfl;
beg	Vinfl;

LEXICON Vinfl

+V+Prs:0	#;
+V+Pst:^ed	#;
+V+Prs+3sg:^s	#;
+v+PstPtcp:^ed	#;
+V+PrsPtcp:^ing	#;
